Arkansas, session 2025, HB1848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-13-101(c), concerning the award of
custody in a case concerning child custody or visitation when a party has
committed an act of domestic violence, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) If a party to an action concerning custody of or a right to
visitation with a child has committed an act of domestic violence abuse
against the party making the allegation or a family or household member of
either party and such allegations are proven by a preponderance of the
evidence at a hearing on the merits, the circuit court must shall consider
the effect of such domestic violence upon the best interests interest of the
child, whether or not the child was physically injured or personally
witnessed the abuse, together with such facts and circumstances as the
circuit court deems relevant in making a directive pursuant to this section.
(2) For purposes of this section, "domestic abuse" means:
*LJH253*
03/18/2025 3:16:06 PM LJH253

HB1848
(A) Physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or the
infliction of fear of imminent physical harm, bodily injury, or assault
between family or household members; or
(B) Any sexual conduct between family or household
members, whether minors or adults, that constitutes an offense under the laws
of this state.
(2)(3) With regard to an award of custody:
(A) There is a rebuttable presumption that it is not in
the best interest of the child to be placed in the sole custody or care of an
abusive parent a parent in cases in which there is a finding by a
preponderance of the evidence that the parent has engaged in a pattern of
domestic abuse or other party who has been found at a hearing on the merits
to have engaged in a pattern of domestic abuse.
(B) The parent or other party that has been found to have
committed domestic abuse has the burden of rebutting the presumption under
subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section by proving by a preponderance of the
evidence that having custody or care of the child will not endanger the child
as set forth in subdivision (b)(1)(A)(vii) of this section.
(4) With regard to an award of reasonable parenting time
provided for in subdivision (b)(1)(A)(vii) of this section to a parent or
other party who fails to rebut the presumption under subdivision (c)(3)(B) of
this section, a court awarding unsupervised parenting time to that parent or
other party:
(A) Shall, in addition to the facts, findings, and
conclusions of law in the court's written order under subdivision (b)(3)(A)
of this section, make findings as to:
(i) Whether the parent or other party poses an
ongoing risk of harm to the child; and
(ii) Why the parent or other party who committed the
domestic abuse does not present a risk of harm to the child; and
(B) May order safety conditions and completion of a
certified domestic violence intervention program for the parent or other
party's visits with the child.



03/18/2025 3:16:06 PM LJH253